Washington statutes.
RCW 2.42.050

Oath.

Every qualified interpreter appointed under this chapter in a judicial or administrative proceeding shall, upon receiving the interpreter's initial qualification from the office of the deaf and hard of hearing, take an oath that a true interpretation will be made to the person being examined of all the proceedings in a manner which the person understands, and that the interpreter will repeat the statements of the person being examined to the court or other agency conducting the proceedings, to the best of the interpreter's skill and judgment.

[ 2017 c 83 s 1; 1989 c 358 s 14; 1985 c 389 s 20; 1973 c 22 s 5.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: ER 604.

Severability—1989 c 358: See note following RCW 2.43.010.